Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2840.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 15-701.05 and 15-701.06, to read: START_STATUTE15-701.05. Nutrition education instruction; requirements; definitions A. Each school district and charter school shall annually provide a minimum number of hours of instruction in nutrition education to students in kindergarten programs and each of grades one through twelve. Each school district and charter school may incorporate the nutrition education instruction required by this section into existing curricula. The nutrition education instruction required by this section must: 1. Emphasize practical applications for a healthy lifestyle. 2. Include scientific evidence relating to each of the following subjects: (a) Diet, exercise and nutrition. (b) The role of nutrition in metabolism and cellular function. (c) The role of nutrition and exercise in preventing nutrition-related chronic diseases. (d) The biological mechanisms related to diet and the impacts of ultraprocessed food on those mechanisms. (e) The role of nutrition and exercise in disease prevention, management and recovery. (f) The importance of nutrient-dense foods in a diet. 3. Require students to demonstrate proficiency in meal planning and reading food labels. B. The state board of education: 1. May develop guidelines to assist school districts and charter schools in providing the nutrition education instruction required by this section, consistent with current scientific and educational standards. 2. Shall prescribe the minimum number of hours of instruction in nutrition education that school districts and charter schools must provide to students in each grade level. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Nutrient-dense food" means a food that is high in vitamins, minerals, fiber and protein and that does not have added sugar or saturated fat. 2. "Nutrition-related chronic disease": (a) Means a disease that is a long-term health condition and that results from poor diet and an absence of regular physical exercise. (b) Includes cardiovascular disease, diabetes, obesity and certain types of cancer. 3. "Scientific evidence" means credible, systematic evidence that is produced by research, testing, data from peer-reviewed studies, expert consensus and measurable outcomes. 4. "Ultraprocessed food" means any food or beverage that contains a high amount of saturated fat, sodium, added sugar, preservatives or artificial ingredients. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE15-701.06. Physical activity requirements; exceptions; definition A. Each school district and charter school shall require students in kindergarten programs and each of grades one through twelve to participate in physical activity for at least thirty minutes during each day of the school week.  A school district or charter school may offer any of the following to satisfy the physical activity requirement prescribed by this section: 1. A physical education program that is designed to teach students physical fitness, teamwork and healthy lifestyles. 2. Scheduled break periods in which students may do one or more of the following: (a) Go outside. (b) Engage in recreational activities with other students. (c) Refocus between classes or after lessons. 3. Active classroom breaks in which students receive a mental and physical break from academic tasks without leaving the classroom. B. A school district or charter school shall excuse a student from all or part of the physical activity requirements prescribed in this section if any of the following applies: 1. A physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17 states in writing that the student should be exempted. 2. The student is a pupil with chronic health problems as defined in section 15-346 and the student's health does not allow the student to participate in the physical activity. 3. The student's individualized education program team makes a determination to excuse the student from all or part of the physical activity requirements. 4. The student is physically ill. C. An employee of a school district or charter school, including personnel who are employed through a third-party contractor, may not prevent a student in a kindergarten program or any of grades one through nine from participating in physical activity that is offered pursuant to this section or as part of the school's physical education curriculum to punish the student for poor academic performance or behavior. D. For the purposes of this section, "physical activity": 1. Means any bodily movement produced by skeletal muscles that requires energy expenditure. 2. Includes walking, running, dancing and participating in a sport. END_STATUTE